New Jersey, session 222, S4265.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section) a. A person shall not operate a motor vehicle with an obstructed license plate. b.    A person shall not sell, offer for sale, distribute, transfer, purchase, receive, or possess any merchandise knowing that the merchandise is designed or intended to create an obstructed license plate.  Merchandise designed or intended to create an obstructed license plate includes, but is not limited to, a retractable license plate holder; reflective spray; a tinted or blackout license plate cover that prevents the identification of the plates registration number; and a license plate flipping device that enables a registration plate to be manually or electronically changed to another registration plate with different identification marks or that is capable of changing the appearance of the registration plate so that it appears to be a different registration plate.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability on a newspaper that accepts or publishes classified advertising for merchandise that is designed or intended to create an obstructed license plate. c.    (1) A person violating a provision of this section shall be subject to a fine not exceeding $500 for a first offense and a fine not exceeding $750 for a second or subsequent offense.  In addition, a person shall be assessed two motor vehicle penalty points pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1982, c.43 (C.39:5-30.5) and two automobile insurance eligibility points pursuant to section 26 of P.L.1990, c.8 (C.17:33B-14) for a third or subsequent violation of subsection a. of this section. (2)  A person fined for violating this section shall not be subject to a fine or penalty under R.S.39:3-33 for having a registration plate that is not plainly visible due to blurring matter or a registration plate, temporary registration certificate, temporary registration plate, or registration plate insert issued by the commission that is concealed or otherwise obscured by a registration plate frame or holder. 2.   R.S.39:1-1 is amended to read as follows: 39:1-1.      As used in this subtitle, unless other meaning is clearly apparent from the language or context, or unless inconsistent with the manifest intention of the Legislature: "Alley" means a public highway wherein the roadway does not exceed 12 feet in width. "Authorized emergency vehicles" means vehicles of the fire department, police vehicles and [such] ambulances and other vehicles as are approved by the chief administrator when operated in response to an emergency call. "Autocycle" means a three-wheeled motorcycle designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals in which the operator and passenger may ride in a completely or partially enclosed seating area that is equipped with a roll cage or roll hoops, safety seat belts for each occupant, and anti-lock brakes. "Automobile" includes all motor vehicles except motorcycles. "Berm" means that portion of the highway, exclusive of the roadway and shoulder, that borders the shoulder but is not to be used for vehicular travel. "Business district" means that portion of a highway and the territory contiguous thereto, where within any 600 feet along [such] the highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes, including, but not limited to, hotels, banks, office buildings, railroad stations, and public buildings which occupy at least 300 feet of frontage on one side or 300 feet collectively on both sides of the roadway. "Car pool" means two or more persons commuting on a daily basis to and from work by means of a vehicle with a seating capacity of nine passengers or less. "Chief Administrator" or "Administrator" means the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. "Commercial motor vehicle" includes every type of motor-driven vehicle used for commercial purposes on the highways, such as the transportation of goods, wares, and merchandise, [excepting such] except vehicles [as] that are run only upon rails or tracks and vehicles of the passenger car type used for touring purposes or the carrying of farm products and milk, as the case may be. "Commission" means the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission established by section 4 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-4). "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Transportation of this State. "Commuter van" means a motor vehicle having a seating capacity of not less than seven nor more than 15 adult passengers, in which seven or more persons commute on a daily basis to and from work and which vehicle may also be operated by the driver or other designated persons for their personal use. "Crosswalk" means that part of a highway at an intersection, either marked or unmarked, existing at each approach of every roadway intersection, included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs or, in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the shoulder, or, if none, from the edges of the roadway, and any portion of a highway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other marking on the surface. "Curb extension" or "bulbout" means a horizontal extension of the sidewalk into the street which results in a narrower roadway section. "Dealer" includes every person actively engaged in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging motor vehicles or motorcycles and who has an established place of business. "Deputy Chief Administrator" means the deputy chief administrator of the commission. "Driver" means the rider or driver of a horse, bicycle, or motorcycle or the driver or operator of a motor vehicle, unless otherwise specified. Electric motorized bicycle means any two-wheeled vehicle with fully operable pedals and an electric motor capable of greater than 750 watts that is capable of reaching a speed greater than 28 miles per hour. Electric vehicle charging space means a publicly accessible charging space or set of charging spaces, with visible signage indicating that the charging space or spaces are available for use by the public for charging plug-in electric vehicles. "Explosives" means any chemical compound or mechanical mixture that is commonly used or intended for the purpose of producing an explosion and which contains any oxidizing and combustive units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities or packing that an ignition by fire, friction, concussion, percussion, or detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects or of destroying life or limb. "Farm tractor" means every motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing plows, mowing machines, and other implements of husbandry. "Flammable liquid" means any liquid having a flash point below 200 degrees Fahrenheit and a vapor pressure not exceeding 40 pounds. "Gross weight" means the combined weight of a vehicle and a load thereon. "High occupancy vehicle" or "HOV" means a vehicle which is used to transport two or more persons, including public transportation, car pool, van pool, and other vehicles, as determined by regulation of the Department of Transportation. "Highway" means the entire width between the boundary lines of every way publicly maintained when any part thereof is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel. "Horse" includes mules and all other domestic animals used as draught animals or beasts of burden. "Inside lane" means the lane nearest the center line of the roadway. "Intersection" means the area embraced within the prolongation of the lateral curb lines or, if none, the lateral boundary lines of two or more highways which join one another at an angle, whether or not [one such highway crosses] the highways cross one another. "Laned roadway" means a roadway which is divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic. "Leased limousine" means any limousine subject to regulation in the State which: is offered for rental or lease, without a driver, to be operated by a limousine service as the lessee, for the purpose of carrying passengers for hire; and is leased or rented for a period of one year or more following registration. "Leased motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle subject to registration in this State which: is offered for rental or lease, without a driver, to be operated by the lessee, the lessees agent or servant, for purposes other than the transportation of passengers for hire; and is leased or rented for a period of one year or more following registration. "Limited-access highway" means every highway, street, or roadway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or from, except at such points only and in [such] a manner as may be determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over [such] the highway, street, or roadway; and includes any highway designated as a "freeway" or "parkway" by authority of law. "Local authorities" means every county, municipal, and other local board or body having authority to adopt local police regulations under the Constitution and laws of this State, including every county governing body with relation to county roads. "Low-speed electric bicycle" means a two-wheeled vehicle with fully operable pedals and an electric motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling, and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour. "Low-speed electric scooter" means a scooter with a floorboard that can be stood upon by the operator, with handlebars, and an electric motor that is capable of propelling the device, with or without human propulsion, at a maximum speed of less than 19 miles per hour. "Low-speed vehicle" means a four-wheeled low-speed vehicle, as defined in 49 C.F.R. s.571.3(b), whose attainable speed is more than 20 miles per hour but not more than 25 miles per hour on a paved level surface and which is not powered by gasoline or diesel fuel and complies with federal safety standards as set forth in 49 C.F.R. s.571.500. "Magistrate" means any municipal court and the Superior Court, and any officer having the powers of a committing magistrate and the chief administrator. "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the business of manufacturing or assembling motor vehicles, who will, under normal business conditions during the year, manufacture or assemble at least 10 new motor vehicles. "Metal tire" means every tire, the surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly made of metal or other hard nonresilient material. "Mid-block crosswalk" means a crosswalk located away from an intersection, distinctly indicated by lines or markings on the surface. 1["Motorized bicycle" means a pedal bicycle that is equipped with:  (1) a helper motor characterized in that either the maximum piston displacement is less than 50 cubic centimeters or the helper motor is rated at no more than 1.5 brake horsepower; (2) an electric motor that can provide assistance when the rider is pedaling or that, through the use of a throttle, can be used to exclusively propel the bicycle to a speed of not more than 15 miles per hour; (3) a helper motor that is powered by an electric drive motor that provides assistance when the rider is pedaling and has a maximum speed between 21 miles per hour and 28 miles per hour on a flat surface; or (4) an electric motor that is capable of propelling the bicycle in excess of 15 miles per hour through the use of a throttle with a maximum motor-powered speed of no more than 28 miles per hour on a flat surface.  This term shall not include a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter, as those terms are defined in this section.]1 "Motorcycle" includes motorcycles, autocycles, motor bikes, electric motorized bicycles, all motor-operated vehicles of the bicycle or tricycle type, and bicycles with a motor attached, except motorized bicycles, low-speed electric bicycles, and low-speed electric scooters, as defined in this section, whether the motive power be a part thereof or attached thereto and having a saddle or seat with driver sitting astride or upon it or a platform on which the driver stands. "Motor-drawn vehicle" includes trailers, semitrailers, or any other type of vehicle drawn by a motor-driven vehicle. 1["Motor vehicle" includes all vehicles propelled otherwise than by muscular power,]1 [excepting such] 1[except vehicles]1 [as] 1[that are run only upon rails or tracks, low-speed electric bicycles, low-speed electric scooters, and motorized bicycles.]1 1"Motorized bicycle" means a pedal bicycle that is equipped with: a helper motor characterized in that either the maximum piston displacement is less than 50 cubic centimeters or the helper motor is rated at no more than 1.5 brake horsepower; an electric motor that can provide assistance when the rider is pedaling or that, through the use of a throttle, can be used to exclusively propel the bicycle to a speed of not more than 15 miles per hour; a helper motor that is powered by an electric drive motor that provides assistance when the rider is pedaling and has a maximum speed between 21 miles per hour and 28 miles per hour on a flat surface; or an electric motor that is capable of propelling the bicycle in excess of 15 miles per hour through the use of a throttle with a maximum motor-powered speed of no more than 28 miles per hour on a flat surface.  This term shall not include a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter, as those terms are defined in this section.1 "Motorized scooter" means a miniature motor vehicle and includes, but is not limited to, pocket bikes, super pocket bikes, scooters, mini-scooters, sport scooters, mini choppers, mini motorcycles, motorized skateboards, and other vehicles with motors not manufactured in compliance with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards and which have no permanent Federal Safety Certification stickers affixed to the vehicle by the original manufacturer.  This term shall not include:  electric personal assistive mobility devices, motorized bicycles, low-speed vehicles, low-speed electric bicycles, or low-speed electric scooters or motorized wheelchairs, mobility scooters, or similar mobility assisting devices used by persons with physical disabilities or persons whose ambulatory mobility has been impaired by age or illness. "Motorized skateboard" means a skateboard that is propelled otherwise than by muscular power. "Motorized wheelchair" means any motor-driven wheelchair utilized to increase the independent mobility in the activities of daily living of an individual who has limited or no ambulation abilities and includes mobility scooters manufactured specifically for [such] these purposes and designed primarily for indoor use. 1"Motor vehicle" includes all vehicles propelled otherwise than by muscular power, except vehicles that are run only upon rails or tracks, low-speed electric bicycles, low-speed electric scooters, and motorized bicycles.1 "Noncommercial truck" means every motor vehicle designed primarily for transportation of property and which is not a "commercial vehicle." "Obstructed license plate" means a registration plate, temporary registration certificate, temporary registration plate, or registration plate insert issued by the commission that a person has purposely concealed or obfuscated 1[in any way to evade] with the intention of evading1 law enforcement or 1[a toll] payment of tolls or other charges1 issued pursuant to Title 27 or Title 32 of the Revised Statutes. "Official traffic control devices" means all signs, signals, markings, and devices not inconsistent with this subtitle placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic. "Omnibus" includes all motor vehicles used for the transportation of passengers for hire, except commuter vans and vehicles used in ridesharing arrangements and school buses if the same are not otherwise used in the transportation of passengers for hire. "Operator" means a person who is in actual physical control of a vehicle or street car. "Outside lane" means the lane nearest the curb or outer edge of the roadway. "Owner" means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle or if a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee or if a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then the conditional vendee, lessee, or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner for the purpose of this subtitle. "Parking" means the standing or waiting on a street, road, or highway of a vehicle not actually engaged in receiving or discharging passengers or merchandise, unless in obedience to traffic regulations or traffic signs or signals. "Passenger automobile" means all automobiles used and designed for the transportation of passengers, other than omnibuses and school buses. "Pedestrian" means a person afoot. "Person" includes natural persons, firms, copartnerships, associations, and corporations. Plug-in electric vehicle means a vehicle that has a battery, or an equivalent energy storage device, that can be charged from an electricity supply external to the vehicle with an electric plug.  This term includes a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle. Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle means a vehicle that can be charged from a source of electricity external to the vehicle through an electric plug, but is not exclusively powered by electricity. "Pneumatic tire" means every tire in which compressed air is designed to support the load. "Pole trailer" means every vehicle without motive power designed to be drawn by another vehicle and attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, or pole, or by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle and ordinarily used for transporting long or irregularly shaped loads, such as poles, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections. "Private road or driveway" means every road or driveway not open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel. "Railroad train" means a steam engine, electric or other motor, with or without cars coupled thereto, operated upon rails, except street cars. "REAL ID basic driver's license" means a basic driver's license issued by the commission that complies with the provisions of the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder. "REAL ID identification card" means an identification card issued by the commission that complies with the provisions of the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder. "REAL ID license" means any license to operate a motor vehicle issued by the commission that complies with the provisions of the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder. "REAL ID motorcycle license" means a motorcycle license issued by the commission that complies with the provisions of the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder. "REAL ID probationary license" means a probationary license issued by the commission that complies with the provisions of the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder. "Recreation vehicle" means a self-propelled or towed vehicle equipped to serve as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel purposes and used solely as a family or personal conveyance. "Residence district" means that portion of a highway and the territory contiguous thereto, not comprising a business district, where within any 600 feet along [such] the highway there are buildings in use for business or residential purposes which occupy 300 feet or more of frontage on at least one side of the highway. "Ridesharing" means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle, with a maximum carrying capacity of not more than 15 passengers, including the driver, where [such] the transportation is incidental to the purpose of the driver.  The term shall include [such] ridesharing arrangements known as car pools and van pools. "Right-of-way" means the privilege of the immediate use of the highway. "Road tractor" means every motor vehicle designed and used for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry any load thereon either independently or any part of the weight of a vehicle or load so drawn. "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, exclusive of the berm or shoulder. In the event a highway includes two or more separate roadways, the term "roadway" as used herein shall refer to [any such roadway] the roadways separately, but not to all [such] the roadways, collectively. "Safety zone" means the area or space officially set aside within a highway for the exclusive use of pedestrians, which is so plainly marked or indicated by proper signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as a safety zone. "School bus" means every motor vehicle operated by, or under contract with, a public or governmental agency, or religious or other charitable organization or corporation, or privately operated for the transportation of children to or from school for secular or religious education, which complies with the regulations of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission affecting school buses, including "School Vehicle Type I" and "School Vehicle Type II" as defined below: "School Vehicle Type I" means any vehicle designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including the driver, used to transport enrolled children, and adults only when serving as chaperones, to or from a school, school-connected activity, day camp, summer day camp, summer residence camp, nursery school, child care center, preschool center, or other similar places of education.  [Such] The vehicle shall comply with the regulations of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission and either the Department of Education or the Department of Human Services, whichever is the appropriate supervising agency. "School Vehicle Type II" means any vehicle designed to transport less than 16 passengers, including the driver, used to transport enrolled children, and adults only when serving as chaperones, to or from a school, school-connected activity, day camp, summer day camp, summer residence camp, nursery school, child care center, preschool center, or other similar places of education.  [Such] The vehicle shall comply with the regulations of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission and either the Department of Education or the Department of Human Services, whichever is the appropriate supervising agency. 1"School crossing" means that portion of a highway where school children are required to cross the highway in the vicinity of a school.1 "School zone" means that portion of a highway which is either contiguous to territory occupied by a school building or is where school crossings are established in the vicinity of a school, upon which are maintained appropriate "school signs" in accordance with specifications adopted by the chief administrator and in accordance with law. 1["School crossing" means that portion of a highway where school children are required to cross the highway in the vicinity of a school.]1 "Semitrailer" means every vehicle with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer, designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that some part of its weight and that of its load rests upon or is carried by another vehicle. "Shipper" means any person who shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, any commodity, produce, or article for transportation as the contents or load of a commercial motor vehicle.  In the case of a sealed ocean container, "shipper" shall not be construed to include any person whose activities with respect to the shipment are limited to the solicitation or negotiation of the sale, resale, or exchange of the commodity, produce, or article within that container. "Shoulder" means that portion of the highway, exclusive of and bordering the roadway, which is designed for emergency use but not ordinarily to be used for vehicular travel. "Sidewalk" means that portion of a highway intended for the use of pedestrians between the curb line or the lateral line of a shoulder or, if none, the lateral line of the roadway and the adjacent right-of-way line. "Sign." See "Official traffic control devices." "Slow-moving vehicle" means a vehicle run at a speed less than the maximum speed then and there permissible. "Solid tire" means every tire of rubber or other resilient material which does not depend upon compressed air for the support of the load. "Standard" means, when used to describe any license to operate a motor vehicle or any identification card issued by the commission under the provisions of this Title, that the issuance of the license or identification card does not require proof of lawful presence in the United States. "Street" means the same as highway. "Street car" means a car, other than a railroad train, used for transporting persons or property and operated upon rails principally within a municipality. "Stop," when required, means complete cessation from movement. "Stopping or standing," when prohibited, means any cessation of movement of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or traffic control sign or signal. "Suburban business or residential district" means that portion of highway and the territory contiguous thereto, where within any 1,320 feet along that highway there is land in use for business or residential purposes and that land occupies more than 660 feet of frontage on one side or collectively more than 660 feet of frontage on both sides of that roadway. "Through highway" means every highway or portion thereof at the entrances to which vehicular traffic from intersecting highways is required by law to stop before entering or crossing the same and when stop signs are erected as provided in this chapter. "Trackless trolley" means every motor vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires but not operated upon rails. "Traffic" means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, street cars, and other conveyances either singly, or together, while using any highway for purposes of travel. "Traffic control signal" means a device, whether manually, electrically, mechanically, or otherwise controlled, by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and to proceed. "Trailer" means every vehicle with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer, designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that no part of its weight rests upon the towing vehicle. "Truck" means every motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property. "Truck tractor" means every motor vehicle designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load so drawn. "Van pooling" means seven or more persons commuting on a daily basis to and from work by means of a vehicle with a seating arrangement designed to carry seven to 15 adult passengers. "Vehicle" means every device in, upon, or by which a person or property is or may be transported upon a highway, [excepting] except devices moved by human power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks or low-speed electric bicycles, low-speed electric scooters, and motorized bicycles. (cf: P.L.2025, c.285, s.1) 3.    Section 1 of P.L.2015, c.49 (C.39:3-33c) is repealed. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.